Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.922, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Fees. (a) new text begin Except as provided in paragraph (d), new text end the fee for a three-year registration of an all-terrain vehicle under this section, other than those registered by a dealer or manufacturer under paragraph (b) or (c), is: (1) for public use, $60; (2) for private use, $6; and (3) for a duplicate or transfer, $4. (b) The total registration fee for all-terrain vehicles owned by a dealer and operated for demonstration or testing purposes is $50 per year. Dealer registrations are not transferable. (c) The total registration fee for all-terrain vehicles owned by a manufacturer and operated for research, testing, experimentation, or demonstration purposes is $150 per year. Manufacturer registrations are not transferable. new text begin (d) A veteran with a total service-connected disability is exempt from the registration fee under paragraph (a) and must be issued a three-year registration free of charge. For purposes of this paragraph, "veteran with a total service-connected disability" means a veteran, as defined in section 197.447, who provides satisfactory evidence to the commissioner demonstrating that the veteran has received a 100 percent total and permanent service-connected disability rating as adjudicated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the retirement board of one of the several branches of the armed forces. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The onetime fee for registration of an all-terrain vehicle under subdivision 2b is $6. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The fees collected under this subdivision must be credited to the all-terrain vehicle account.